Washington statutes.
RCW 11.32.020

Bond.

Every such administrator shall, before entering on the duties of his or her trust, give bond, with sufficient surety or sureties, in such sum as the judge shall order, payable to the state of Washington, with conditions as required of an executor or in other cases of administration: PROVIDED, That in all cases where a bank or trust company authorized to act as administrator is appointed special administrator or acts as special administrator under an appointment as such heretofore made, no bond shall be required.

[ 2010 c 8 s 2026; 1965 c 145 s 11.32.020. Prior: 1963 c 46 s 2; 1917 c 156 s 82; RRS s 1452; prior: Code 1881 s 1420; 1863 pp 220, 222 ss 126, 138; 1860 pp 183, 184 ss 93, 105.]

NOTES:

Bond of personal representative: RCW 11.28.185.